New Jersey, session 221, S4033.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  As used in this section: Seasonal worker means the same as that term is defined in section 2 of P.L.1945, c.71 (C.34:9A-2). Short-term farm labor housing means a building consisting of housing or sleeping places provided to seasonal workers for periods not to exceed three months, as part of a farm labor camp, as defined in section 2 of P.L.1945, c.71 (C.34:9A-2). b.  Short-term farm labor housing that includes fire protection measures that  provide for the installation of fire extinguishers and early warning fire protection devices such as smoke and carbon monoxide detectors, and ingress and egress standards, may be used as short-term farm labor housing and shall be deemed in compliance with the State Uniform Construction Code, adopted pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1975, c.217 (C.52:27D-123). c.  The commissioner shall adopt, pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1975, 217 (C.52:27D-123) and the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), any rules or regulations determined necessary to implement the provisions of subsection b. of this section. 2.  On or before the first day of the sixth month next following the enactment of this act, the Commissioner of Community Affairs shall adopt rules and regulations, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), to modify the State Uniform Construction Code in accordance with the provisions of this act. 3.  This act shall take effect on the first day of the sixth month next following enactment, except that the Commissioner of Community Affairs may take such anticipatory action as may be necessary to implement the provisions of this act.